California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
In case such citation cannot be served, or the person served fails to obey it, or in any case in which it appears to the court that the citation will probably be ineffective, a warrant of arrest may issue on the order of the court either against the parent, or guardian, or the person having the custody of the minor, or with whom the minor is.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

663.

(a) Whenever a petition has been filed in the juvenile court alleging that a minor comes within the provisions of Section 601 or 602 of this code and praying for a hearing thereon, or whenever any subsequent petition has been filed praying for a hearing in the matter of the minor, a warrant of arrest may be issued immediately for the minor upon a showing that any one of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) It appears to the court that the conduct and behavior of the minor may endanger the health, person, welfare, or property of himself or herself, or others, or that the circumstances of his or her home environment may endanger the health, person, welfare, or property of the minor.

(2) It appears to the court that either personal service upon the minor has been unsuccessful, or the whereabouts of the minor are unknown.

(3) It appears to the court that the minor has willfully evaded service of process.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of parents or guardians to receive the notice and a copy of the petition pursuant to Section 660.

(History: Amended March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

664.

(a) The district attorney or the attorney of record for the minor may issue, and upon request of the probation officer, the minor, or the minor’s parent, guardian, or custodian, the court or the clerk of the court shall issue, and, on the court’s own motion, the court may issue, subpoenas requiring attendance and testimony of witnesses and production of papers at any hearing regarding a minor who is alleged or determined by the court to be a person described by Section 601 or 602.

(b) When a person attends a juvenile court hearing as a witness upon a subpoena, in its discretion, the court may by an order on its minutes, direct the county auditor to draw his or her warrant upon the county treasurer in favor of the witness for witness fees in the amount and manner prescribed by Section 68093 of the Government Code. The fees are county charges.

(c) (1) The court shall use whatever means are appropriate, including, but not limited to, the issuance of a subpoena, if appropriate, to require the presence of the parent, parents, or guardian of a child at the detention, jurisdictional, and disposition hearings regarding a minor who is alleged or determined by the court to be a person described by Section 601 or 602 unless the court determines that it would be in the best interests of the child for the parent to not attend or the court finds that it would impose a hardship upon the parent or guardian to attend. Any parent or guardian who does not attend a hearing pursuant to a subpoena under this section is guilty of contempt unless the court excuses, for good cause, the parent or guardian from attending the hearing or the court finds that the parent or guardian has a satisfactory excuse for not attending.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “parent” includes a foster parent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 903, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Wards—Hearings [675. - 714.]

675.

(a) All cases under the provisions of this chapter shall be heard at a special or separate session of the court, and no other matter shall be heard at that session. Except as provided in subdivision (b), no person on trial, awaiting trial, or under accusation of crime, other than a parent, guardian, or relative of the minor, shall be permitted to be present at any such session, except as a witness.

(b) Hearings for two or more minors may be heard upon the same rules of joinder, consolidation, and severance as apply to trials in a court of criminal
 jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 390, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.

(a) Unless requested by the minor concerning whom the petition has been filed and any parent or guardian present, the public shall not be admitted to a juvenile court hearing. Nothing in this section shall preclude the attendance of up to two family members of a prosecuting witness for the support of that witness, as authorized by Section 868.5 of the Penal Code. The judge or referee may nevertheless admit those persons he or she deems to have a direct and legitimate interest in the particular case or the work of the court. However, except as provided in subdivision (b), members of the public shall be admitted, on the same basis as they may be admitted to trials in a court of criminal jurisdiction, to hearings concerning petitions filed
 pursuant to Section 602 alleging that a minor is a person described in Section 602 by reason of the violation of any one of the following offenses:

(1) Murder.

(2) Arson of an inhabited building.

(3) Robbery while armed with a dangerous or deadly weapon.

(4) Rape with force or violence, threat of great bodily harm, or when the person is prevented from resisting due to being rendered unconscious by any intoxicating, anesthetizing, or controlled substance, or when the victim is at the time incapable, because of
 a disability, of giving consent, and this is known or reasonably should be known to the person committing the offense.

(5) Sodomy by force, violence, duress, menace, threat of great bodily harm, or when the person is prevented from resisting due to being rendered unconscious by any intoxicating, anesthetizing, or controlled substance, or when the victim is at the time incapable, because of a disability, of giving consent, and this is known or reasonably should be known to the person committing the offense.

(6) Oral copulation by force, violence, duress, menace, threat of great bodily harm, or when the person is prevented from resisting due to being rendered unconscious by any intoxicating, anesthetizing, or controlled substance, or when the victim is at the time
 incapable, because of a disability, of giving consent, and this is known or reasonably should be known to the person committing the offense.

(7) Any offense specified in subdivision (a) or (e) of Section 289 of the Penal Code.

(8) Kidnapping for ransom.

(9) Kidnapping for purpose of robbery.

(10) Kidnapping with bodily harm.

(11) Assault with intent to murder or attempted murder.

(12) Assault with a firearm or destructive device.

(13) Assault by any means of force likely to produce
 great bodily injury.

(14) Discharge of a firearm into an inhabited dwelling or occupied building.

(15) Any offense described in Section 1203.09 of the Penal Code.

(16) Any offense described in Section 12022.5 or 12022.53 of the Penal Code.

(17) Any felony offense in which a minor personally used a weapon described in any provision listed in Section 16590 of the Penal Code.

(18) Burglary of an inhabited dwelling house or trailer coach, as defined in Section 635 of the Vehicle Code, or the inhabited portion of any other building, if the minor previously has been adjudged a ward of
 the court by reason of the commission of any offense listed in this section, including an offense listed in this paragraph.

(19) Any felony offense described in Section 136.1 or 137 of the Penal Code.

(20) Any offense as specified in Sections 11351, 11351.5, 11352, 11378, 11378.5, 11379, and 11379.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(21) Criminal street gang activity which constitutes a felony pursuant to Section 186.22 of the Penal Code.

(22) Manslaughter as specified in Section 192 of the Penal Code.

(23) Driveby shooting or discharge of a weapon from or at a
 motor vehicle as specified in Sections 246, 247, and 26100 of the Penal Code.

(24) Any crime committed with an assault weapon, as defined in Section 30510 of the Penal Code, including possession of an assault weapon as specified in Section 30605 of the Penal Code.

(25) Carjacking, while armed with a dangerous or deadly weapon.

(26) Kidnapping, in violation of Section 209.5 of the Penal Code.

(27) Torture, as described in Sections 206 and 206.1 of the Penal Code.

(28) Aggravated mayhem, in violation of Section 205 of the Penal Code.

(b) Where the petition filed alleges that the minor is a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of rape with force or violence or great bodily harm; sodomy by force, violence, duress, menace, threat of great bodily harm, or when the person is prevented from resisting by any intoxicating, anesthetizing, or controlled substance, or when the victim is at the time incapable, because of mental disorder or developmental or physical disability, of giving consent, and this is known or reasonably should be known to the person committing the offense; oral copulation by force, violence, duress, menace, threat of great bodily harm, or when the person is prevented from resisting by any intoxicating, anesthetizing, or controlled substance, or when the victim is at the time incapable, because of mental disorder or developmental or physical disability, of giving consent, and this is known
 or reasonably should be known to the person committing the offense;
 any offense specified in Section 289 of the Penal Code, members of the public shall not be admitted to the hearing in either of the following instances:

(1) Upon a motion for a closed hearing by the district attorney, who shall make the motion if so requested by the victim.

(2) During the victim’s testimony, if, at the time of the offense the victim was under 16 years of age.

(c) The name of a minor found to have committed one of the offenses listed in subdivision (a) shall not be confidential, unless
 the court, for good cause, so orders. As used in this subdivision, “good cause” shall be limited to protecting the personal safety of the minor, a victim, or a member of the public. The court shall make a written finding, on the record, explaining why good cause exists to make the name of the minor confidential.

(d) Notwithstanding Sections 827 and 828 and subject to subdivisions (e) and (f), when a petition is sustained for any offense listed in subdivision (a), the charging petition, the minutes of the proceeding, and the orders of adjudication and disposition of the court that are contained in the court file shall be available for public inspection. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to authorize public access to any other documents in the court file.

(e) The probation officer or any party may petition the juvenile court to prohibit disclosure to the public of any file or record. The juvenile court shall prohibit the disclosure if it appears that the harm to the minor, victims, witnesses, or public from the public disclosure outweighs the benefit of public knowledge. However, the court shall not prohibit disclosure for the benefit of the minor unless the court makes a written finding that the reason for the prohibition is to protect the safety of the minor.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be applied to limit the disclosure of information as otherwise provided for by law.

(g) The juvenile court shall for each day that the court is in session, post in a conspicuous place which is accessible to the general public, a
 written list of hearings that are open to the general public pursuant to this section, the location of those hearings, and the time when the hearings will be held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 919, Sec. 2.   (SB 838)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Note: This section was amended on March 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

676.5.

The right of victims of juvenile offenses to be present during juvenile proceedings, as specified in subdivision (a), shall be secured as follows:

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in subdivision (d), a victim and up to two support persons of the victim’s choosing shall be entitled to be admitted, on the same basis as he or she may be admitted to trials in a court of criminal jurisdiction, to juvenile court hearings concerning petitions filed pursuant to Section 602 alleging
 the commission of any criminal offense, and shall be so notified by the probation officer in person or by registered mail, return receipt requested, together with a notice explaining all other rights and services available to the victim with respect to the case.

(b) A victim or his or her support person may be excluded from a juvenile court hearing described in subdivision (a) only if each of the following criteria are met:

(1) Any movant, including the minor defendant, who seeks to exclude the victim or his or her support person from a hearing demonstrates that there is a substantial probability that overriding interests will be prejudiced by the presence of the victim or his or her support person.

(2) The court considers reasonable alternatives to exclusion of the victim or his or her support person from the
 hearing.

(3) The exclusion of the victim or his or her support person from a hearing, or any limitation on his or her presence at a hearing, is narrowly tailored to serve the overriding interests identified by the movant.

(4) Following a hearing at which any person who is to be excluded from a juvenile court hearing is afforded an opportunity to be heard, the court makes specific factual findings that support the exclusion of the victim or his or her support person from, or any limitation on his or her presence at, the juvenile court hearing.

(c) As used in this section, “victim” means (1) the alleged victim of the offense and one person of his or her choosing or however many more the court may allow under the particular circumstances surrounding the proceeding, (2) in the event that the victim is unable to attend
 the proceeding, two persons designated by the victim or however many more the court may allow under the particular circumstances surrounding the proceeding, or (3) if the victim is no longer living, two members of the victim’s immediate family or however many more the court may allow under the particular circumstances surrounding the proceeding.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent a court from excluding a victim or his or her support person from a hearing, pursuant to Section 777 of the Evidence Code, when the victim is subpoenaed as a witness. An order of exclusion shall be consistent with the objectives of paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) to allow the victim to be present, whenever possible, at all hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 996, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

677.

At any juvenile court hearing conducted by a juvenile court judge, an official court reporter shall, and at any such hearing conducted by a juvenile court referee, the official reporter, as directed by the court, may take down in shorthand all the testimony and all of the statements and remarks of the judge and all persons appearing at the hearing; and, if directed by the judge, or requested by the person on whose behalf the petition was brought, or by his parent or legal guardian, or the attorneys of such persons, he must, within such reasonable time after the hearing of the petition as the court may designate, write out the same or such specific portions thereof as may be
 requested in plain and legible longhand or by typewriter or other printing machine and certify to the same as being correctly reported and transcribed, and when directed by the court, file the same with the clerk of the court. Unless otherwise directed by the judge, the costs of writing out and transcribing all or any portion of the reporter’s shorthand notes shall be paid in advance at the rates fixed for transcriptions in a civil action by the person requesting the same.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

678.

The provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 469) of Title 6 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to variance and amendment of pleadings in civil actions shall apply to petitions and proceedings under this chapter, to the same extent and with the same effect as if proceedings under this chapter were civil actions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

679.

A minor who is the subject of a juvenile court hearing and any person entitled to notice of the hearing under the provisions of Section 658, is entitled to be present at such hearing. Any such minor and any such person has the right to be represented at such hearing by counsel of his own choice or, if unable to afford counsel, has the right to be represented by counsel appointed by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

679.5.

(a) A juvenile justice proceeding may be conducted in whole or in part through the use of remote technology, subject to the provisions of this section.

(b) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Juvenile justice proceeding” means a conference, hearing, or proceeding pursuant to Section 601 or 602.

(2) “Minor” means a person subject to a petition pursuant to Section 601 or 602.

(3) “Remote proceeding” means a juvenile justice proceeding conducted in whole or in part through the use of remote technology.

(4) “Remote technology” means technology that provides for the two-way transmission of video and audio signals except that audio signals alone may be permitted where specifically authorized by subdivision (k) of Section 224.2. Remote technology shall include, but not be limited to, a computer, tablet, telephone, cellular telephone, or other electronic or communications device. Notwithstanding the foregoing, and subject to subdivision (i), a minor, minor’s family member or guardian, at the individual’s request, may participate through audio only technology.

(c) Except as provided in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f), a minor has the right to be physically present in any juvenile justice proceeding and has the right, subject to express waiver, to the physical presence of defense counsel, any prosecution witnesses whom the prosecution calls to testify, and the judicial officer.

(d) A minor, in consultation with counsel, may waive their right to be physically present and may elect to appear remotely. The court shall take the waiver on the record, but the waiver may be taken remotely. If the minor waives their right to be physically present, the minor, in consultation with counsel, also may waive their right to physical presence of persons identified in subdivision (c).

(e) If the minor is physically present in court, defense counsel shall be physically present absent exceptional circumstances and subject to the express waiver of the minor. If a minor waives their right to be physically present and appears remotely, defense counsel may also appear remotely.

(f) A minor’s parent or guardian may appear through remote technology, subject to the court’s authority to require the person to be
 physically present, in accordance, and consistent, with subdivision (i).

(g) A minor retains the same constitutional rights as a criminal defendant to confront and cross-examine witnesses.

(h) The court shall not require any party or witness to appear through the use of remote technology.

(i) (1) If any of the following conditions are present and cannot be resolved, the court shall not permit any party, counsel, or witness to appear or participate in a juvenile justice proceeding through the use of remote technology, and shall continue any juvenile justice proceeding being conducted with remote technology:

(A) The court does not have the technology necessary to conduct the juvenile justice proceeding remotely.

(B) Although the court has the requisite technology, the quality of the technology or audibility prevents the effective management or resolution of the juvenile justice proceeding.

(C) The quality of the technology or audibility at a juvenile justice proceeding inhibits the court reporter’s ability to accurately prepare and certify a transcript of the juvenile justice proceeding.

(D) The court reporter is unable to capture the verbatim record and certify a transcript of any proceeding that is conducted remotely, in whole or in part, to the same extent and in the same manner as if it were not conducted remotely.

(E) The quality of the technology or audibility at a juvenile justice proceeding prevents an attorney from being able to provide effective
 representation to the attorney’s client.

(F) The quality of the technology or audibility at a juvenile justice proceeding inhibits a court interpreter’s ability to provide language access to a court user or authorized individual.

(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, the court may require a party or witness to appear in person if the court determines on a hearing-by-hearing basis that an inperson appearance would materially assist in the determination of the proceeding or the resolution of the case. The court’s determination shall be based on the individual case before the court and the basis for the determination shall be stated on the record. In making its determination, the court shall consider the request of the minor, the nature of the proceedings, and whether requiring the physical presence of the minor would disrupt the education, employment, treatment, or case plan of
 the minor or would otherwise result in a significant hardship to the minor or the minor’s family.

(j) If, at any time during a remote proceeding, the court determines that an inperson appearance is necessary, the court may require such an appearance and continue the matter for only a period of time that is necessary to ensure the party or witness is physically present, considering the factors specified in subdivision (i). The court shall only continue the matter for such period of time as is necessary to ensure the matter can be heard in person. The court shall not continue proceedings beyond statutory time limits pursuant to this section absent a waiver by the minor in consultation with counsel.

(k) (1) Until July 1, 2024, when the court conducts proceedings that will be reported by an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore, the reporter shall be
 physically present in the same room as the judicial officer except where the court finds that, as the result of unusual circumstances, this requirement would place extreme or undue hardship on the court or the litigants. For purposes of this paragraph, “unusual circumstances” means a work stoppage, a circumstance described in paragraph (a) of Section 68115 of the Government Code, an unforeseen emergency, court proceedings conducted in a remote court location to which a judicial officer is not regularly assigned to sit, or when a judicial officer has to travel to a location outside a courthouse to conduct the proceeding.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2024, when the court conducts proceedings that will be reported by an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore, the reporter shall be physically present in the same room as the judicial officer if the court cannot provide the technology standards described in subdivision (n).

(l) The court may develop local procedures or protocols that benefit minors and families, while ensuring that the constitutional and statutory rights of the minor are protected in remote proceedings, and that a party is not prejudiced by lack of access to, or ability to effectively use, remote technology in any juvenile justice proceeding.

(m) When conducting remote proceedings, the court shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that any party appearing remotely can participate in the proceeding in real time, with no delay in aural or visual transmission or reception.

(2) Ensure that the statements of participants are audible to all other participants and court staff and that the statements made by a participant are identifiable as
 being made by that participant.

(3) Ensure that any juvenile justice proceeding that is conducted remotely, in whole or in part, is reported to the same extent and in the same manner as if it were not conducted remotely.

(4) Ensure that the quality of the technology or audibility at a remote proceeding does not prevent an attorney from being able to provide effective representation to the attorney’s client.

(5) Ensure that a minor appearing remotely is able to communicate confidentially with their attorney during the remote proceeding and provide timely notice to all parties of the steps necessary to secure confidential communication. A request for a confidential attorney-client communication during the remote proceeding shall be granted by the court to ensure effective representation of the minor under the
 California and the United States Constitutions.

(6) Ensure that the quality of the technology or audibility at a remote proceeding does not inhibit the court reporter’s ability to accurately prepare and certify a transcript of the remote proceeding.

(7) Ensure that the quality of the technology or audibility at a remote proceeding does not inhibit a court interpreter’s ability to provide language access to a minor, a parent, or other individual ordered by the court to have access to court interpreter services.

(8) Ensure there is a process, before the court with jurisdiction over the case proceeds with a remote proceeding, for a party, witness, official reporter, official reporter pro tempore, court interpreter, or other court personnel to alert the judicial officer of technology or audibility issues that arise
 during the remote proceeding.

(9) Ensure that the juvenile justice proceedings remain confidential, as required by law.

(10) Permit a party to appear in person for a juvenile justice proceeding at the time and place for which the proceeding was noticed, even if that party had previously notified the court of an intent to appear remotely.

(11) Publish information online providing the instructions necessary for participants to appear remotely.

(n) By April 1, 2024, the Judicial Council shall adopt, and trial courts shall implement by July 1, 2024, minimum standards for the courtroom technology necessary to permit remote participation in juvenile justice proceedings. Such standards shall include, but not be limited to, hard-wired or other reliable
 high-speed internet connections in the courtroom for the judicial officer and court reporter, and monitors, dedicated cameras, speakers, and microphones so the judicial officer, court reporter, and court interpreter can appropriately see and hear remote participants, as well as to ensure that remote participants can appropriately see and hear the judicial officer and other courtroom participants.

(o) Consistent with federal and California labor law, a trial court shall not retaliate or threaten to retaliate against an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore who notifies the judicial officer that technology or audibility issues are impeding the creation of the verbatim record of a proceeding conducted pursuant to this section that includes participation through remote technology. This subdivision shall only apply to an official reporter and official reporter pro tempore when they meet the definition of “trial court employee” under
 subdivision (l) of Section 71601 of the Government Code.

(p) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 29, Sec. 11.   (SB 174)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

680.

The judge of the juvenile court shall control all proceedings during the hearings with a view to the expeditious and effective ascertainment of the jurisdictional facts and the ascertainment of all information relative to the present condition and future welfare of the person upon whose behalf the petition is brought. Except where there is a contested issue of fact or law, the proceedings shall be conducted in an informal nonadversary atmosphere with a view to obtaining the maximum co-operation of the minor upon whose behalf the petition is brought and all persons interested in his welfare with such provisions as the court may make for the disposition and care of such
 minor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

681.

(a) In a juvenile court hearing which is based upon a petition that alleges that the minor upon whose behalf the petition is being brought is a person within the description of Section 602, the prosecuting attorney shall appear on behalf of the people of the State of California.

(b) In a juvenile court hearing which is based upon a petition that alleges that the minor upon whose behalf the petition is being brought is a person within the description of Section 601 and the minor who is the subject of the hearing is represented by counsel, the prosecuting attorney may, with the consent or at
 the request of the juvenile court judge, or at the request of the probation officer with the consent of the juvenile court judge, appear and participate in the hearing to assist in the ascertaining and presenting of the evidence. Where the petition in a juvenile court proceeding alleges that a minor is a person described in subdivision (a), (b), or (d) of Section 300, and either of the parents, or the guardian, or other person having care or custody of the minor, or who resides in the home of the minor, is charged in a pending criminal prosecution based upon unlawful acts committed against the minor, the prosecuting attorney shall, with the consent or at the request of the juvenile court judge, represent the minor in the interest of the state at the juvenile court proceeding. The terms and conditions of such representation shall be with the consent or approval of the judge of the juvenile court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

681.5.

If a prosecuting attorney has appeared on behalf of the people of the State of California in any juvenile court hearing which is based upon a petition that alleges that a minor is a person within the description of Section 602, neither that prosecuting attorney nor any attorney from the office of that prosecuting attorney shall represent the minor in a juvenile court proceeding alleging that a minor is a person described in Section 300.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 618.5 by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 188.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

682.

(a) To continue any hearing relating to proceedings pursuant to Section 601 or 602, regardless of the custody status of the minor, beyond the time limit within which the hearing is otherwise required to be heard, a written notice shall be filed and served on all parties to the proceeding at least two court days before the hearing sought to be continued, together with affidavits or declarations detailing specific facts showing good cause for the continuance.

(b) A continuance shall
 be granted only upon a showing of good cause and only for that period of time shown to be necessary by the moving party at the hearing on the motion. Neither stipulation of the parties nor convenience of the parties is, in and of itself, good cause. Whenever any continuance is granted, the facts which require the continuance shall be entered into the minutes.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a party may make a motion for a continuance without complying with the requirements of that subdivision. However, unless the moving party shows good cause for failure to comply with those requirements, the court shall deny the motion.

(d) In any case in which the minor is represented by counsel and no objection is made to an order continuing any such hearing beyond the time limit within which the hearing is otherwise required to be held, the absence of such an objection shall be deemed a
 consent to the continuance.

(e) When any hearing is continued pursuant to this section, the hearing shall commence on the date to which it was continued or within seven days thereafter whenever the court is satisfied that good cause exists and the moving party will be prepared to proceed within that time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 126, Sec. 1.   Effective July 7, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

700.

At the beginning of the hearing on a petition filed pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 650) of this chapter, the judge or clerk shall first read the petition to those present and upon request of the minor upon whose behalf the petition has been brought or upon the request of any parent, relative or guardian, the judge shall explain any term of allegation contained therein and the nature of the hearing, its procedures, and possible consequences. The judge shall advise those present that if the petition or petitions are sustained and the minor is ordered to make restitution to the victim, or to pay fines or penalty assessments, the parent or guardian may be liable for the payment of restitution, fines, or
 penalty assessments. The judge shall ascertain whether the minor and his or her parent or guardian or adult relative, as the case may be, has been informed of the right of the minor to be represented by counsel, and if not, the judge shall advise the minor and that person, if present, of the right to have counsel present and where applicable, of the right to appointed counsel. The court shall appoint counsel to represent the minor if he or she appears at the hearing without counsel, whether he or she is unable to afford counsel or not, unless there is an intelligent waiver of the right of counsel by the minor. The court shall continue the hearing for not to exceed seven days, as necessary to make an appointment of counsel, or to enable counsel to acquaint himself or herself with the case, and shall continue the hearing as necessary to provide reasonable opportunity for the minor and the parent or guardian or
 adult relative to prepare for the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 13.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

700.1.

Any motion to suppress as evidence any tangible or intangible thing obtained as a result of an unlawful search or seizure shall be heard prior to the attachment of jeopardy and shall be heard at least five judicial days after receipt of notice by the people unless the people are willing to waive a portion of this time.

If the court grants a motion to suppress prior to the attachment of jeopardy over the objection of the people, the court shall enter a judgment of dismissal as to all counts of the petition except those counts on which the prosecuting attorney elects to proceed pursuant to Section 701.

If, prior to the attachment of jeopardy, opportunity for this motion did not exist or the person alleged to come within the provisions of the juvenile court law was not aware of the grounds for the motion, that person shall have the right to make this motion during the course of the proceeding under Section 701.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1095, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

700.2.

Upon his or her appearance before the juvenile court on a complaint charging violation of Section 48293 of the Education Code, the juvenile court shall inform the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the minor of the right to an open hearing and of the right to have a hearing on the complaint before a judge different than the judge who has heard or is to hear the proceeding pursuant to Section 601. The provisions of Section 170.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be explained to the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the minor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 120, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

700.3.

If a petition filed in the juvenile court alleging that a minor comes within the provisions of Section 602 alleges that a minor has committed an offense that would, in the case of an adult, be punishable alternatively as a felony or a misdemeanor, the court, subject to a hearing, at any stage of a proceeding under Section 602, may determine that the offense is a misdemeanor, in which event the case shall proceed as if the minor had been brought before the court on a misdemeanor petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 197, Sec. 37.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

701.

At the hearing, the court shall first consider only the question whether the minor is a person described by Section 300, 601, or 602. The admission and exclusion of evidence shall be pursuant to the rules of evidence established by the Evidence Code and by judicial decision. Proof beyond a reasonable doubt supported by evidence, legally admissible in the trial of criminal cases, must be adduced to support a finding that the minor is a person described by Section 602, and a preponderance of evidence, legally admissible in the trial of civil cases must be adduced to support a finding that the minor is a person described by Section 300 or 601. When it appears that the minor has
 made an extrajudicial admission or confession and denies the same at the hearing, the court may continue the hearing for not to exceed seven days to enable the prosecuting attorney to subpoena witnesses to attend the hearing to prove the allegations of the petition. If the minor is not represented by counsel at the hearing, it shall be deemed that objections that could have been made to the evidence were made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

701.1.

At the hearing, the court, on motion of the minor or on its own motion, shall order that the petition be dismissed and that the minor be discharged from any detention or restriction therefore ordered, after the presentation of evidence on behalf of the petitioner has been closed, if the court, upon weighing the evidence then before it, finds that the minor is not a person described by Section 601 or 602. If such a motion at the close of evidence offered by the petitioner is not granted, the minor may offer evidence without first having reserved that right.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 266, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

After hearing the evidence, the court shall make a finding, noted in the minutes of the court, whether or not the minor is a person described by Section 300, 601, or 602. If it finds that the minor is not such a person, it shall order that the petition be dismissed and the minor be discharged from any detention or restriction theretofore ordered. If the court finds that the minor is such a person, it shall make and enter its findings and order accordingly, and shall then proceed to hear evidence on the question of the proper disposition to be made of the minor. Prior to doing so, it may continue the hearing, if necessary, to receive the social study of the